Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1085.66 of Title 82, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. 1. The Oklahoma Water Resources Board shall establish and
administer a Water and Wastewater Infrastructure Investment Program.
The program shall include development of competitive loans for
eligible entities seeking to develop and implement water and
wastewater improvement projects, including, but not limited to,
incentivizing planning for water and wastewater infrastructure for
workforce housing development and commercial site readiness. The

Board shall promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions of this
act and loan criteria for the program.
2. For the purposes of this section, “eligible entity” or
“eligible entities” means an eligible entity as defined pursuant to
Section 1085.32 of Title 82 of the Oklahoma Statutes. However, the
Board may allocate funds to private citizens or entities for
environmental compliance and management programs.
B. All loans authorized pursuant to the provisions of this act
shall include a clawback provision in the funding agreement with an
eligible entity. For the purposes of this subsection, a “clawback
provision” shall mean a condition precedent to participate in the
program whereby a loan recipient agrees in writing to reimburse the
program all, or any part of, the loan disbursed to the recipient
upon the failure of the recipient to fulfill loan contract terms.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1085.67 of Title 82, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. 1. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a
revolving fund for the Oklahoma Water Resources Board to be
designated the “Water and Wastewater Infrastructure Investment
Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject
to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies
appropriated to the fund by law. All monies accruing to the credit
of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended
by the Board for the purposes provided in this act. The Board may
enter into contracts with financial institutions and execute such
instruments as may be necessary to hold and disseminate loan funds
in accordance with applicable regulations and Board policies.
2. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, principal and
interest income and repayment of principal on loans made from the
balance of the fund shall accrue to the fund.
B. The Board shall have full discretion of all monies within
the fund for enhancements, leveraging, and reserve capacities for
the Board loan and grant programs, system evaluation and risk
assessment assistance, and long-range infrastructure planning.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1176 Page 2

SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1176 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 14th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 16th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1176 Page 4